de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Mundpflege: Mundsprays; Zahnseide; Aufbissschienen; Ersatzdüsen für Mundduschen; Mundduschen; Zahnprothesehaftmittel; Gebissreiniger; Reparatursets für Zahnprothesen; Zahnersatz; Zahnfleischstimulierende Geräte; Interdentalbürsten; Mundwasser; Ölzieh-Öle; Mundgele; Orale probiotische Lutschtabletten & Tabletten; Spangen-, Gebiss- & Aufbissschienendosen; Kieferorthopädisches Wachs; Interdentalreiniger; Zahnaufhellung; Zungenreiniger; Zahnschmuck; Zahnbürstenzubehör; Zahnbürsten; Zahnpasta; Zahnpastapressen & -spender; Zahnstocherhalter & -etuis; Zahnstocher
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Mondverzorging: Mondsprays; Flossdraad; Gebitsbeschermers; Vervangingsopzetstukken voor mondwatersproeiers; Tanddouches; Kleefmiddelen voor kunstgebitten; Prothesereinigers; Reparatiesets voor kunstgebitten; Kunstgebitten; Tandvleesstimulatoren; Interdentale borstels; Mondwater; Olie spoelen oliën; Orale gels; Orale probiotische zuigtabletten en tabletten; Orthodontische opbergboxen; Orthodontische wax; Flossmaterialen; Tandbleekmiddelen; Tongschrapers; Tand edelstenen en tandensieraden; Tandenborstelaccessoires; Tandenborstels; Tandpasta; Tandpastadispensers en squeezers; Tandenstoker houders en hoezen; Tandenstokers
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Burnos priežiūra: Burnos gaivikliai; Dantų siūlai; Apsauginės dantų kapos; Burnos purkštuvų atsarginiai antgaliai; Burnos purkštuvai; Dantų protezų klijai; Dantų protezų valikliai; Dantų protezų taisymo rinkiniai; Dantų protezai; Dantenų stimuliatoriai; Tarpdančių šepetėliai; Burnos skalavimo skystis; Aliejai skalavimui; Burnos geliai; Burnos probiotikinės pastilės ir tabletės; Ortodontinių prietaisų dėklai; Ortodontinis vaškas; Burnos irigatoriai; Dantų balikliai; Liežuvio grandikliai; Dantų papuošalai; Dantų šepetėlių priedai; Dantų šepetėliai; Dantų pasta; Dantų pastos spaustukai ir dozatoriai; Dantų krapštukų laikikliai ir dėklai; Dantų krapštukai
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Péče o ústní dutinu: Ústní spreje; Zubní nitě; Chrániče zubů; Náhradní nástavce pro ústní sprchy; Ústní sprchy; Lepidla na zubní náhrady; Přípravky na čištění umělého chrupu; Sady na opravy zubních protéz; Umělý chrup; Stimulátory dásní; Mezizubní kartáčky; Ústní voda; Oleje na oil pulling; Ústní gely; Ústní probiotické pastilky a tablety; Pouzdra na zubní protézy a rovnátka; Ortodontický vosk; Nástavec na dentální nitě; Přípravky na bělení zubů; Škrabky na jazyk; Zubní ozdoby a dentální šperky; Zubní kartáčky – příslušenství; Zubní kartáčky; Zubní pasty; Zásobníky a dávkovače zubní pasty; Držáky a pouzdra na párátka; Párátka
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Igiene orale: Spray per l'alito; Filo interdentale; Bite antibruxismo; Punte sostitutive per idropulsori dentali; Idropulsori dentali; Adesivi dentiera; Detergenti per dentiere; Kit per la riparazione dei denti; Dentiere; Stimolatori gengivali; Spazzolini interdentali; Collutorio; Oli per la pulizia con olio; Gel orali; Pastiglie e compresse probiotiche orali; Custodie per dentiere; Cera ortodontica; Power flosser; Sbiancante per denti; Spazzolini per la lingua; Gemme per denti e gioielli dentali; Accessori per spazzolini; Spazzolini da denti; Dentifricio; Spremidentifricio e dispenser; Portastuzzicadenti e custodie; Stuzzicadenti
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Suunhoito: Suusuihkeet; Hammaslanka; Hammassuojat; Hammasvälisuuttimien vaihtopäät; Hammasvälisuuttimet; Hammasproteesin kiinnitysaineet; Hammasproteesien puhdistus; Hammasproteesien huoltosetit; Hammasproteesit; Ienstimulaattorit; Hammasväliharja; Suuvesi; Oil Pulling -öljy; Suugeeli; Suun probioottipastilli ja -tabletti; Oikomishoitopakkaukset; Oikomishoidon vaha; Hammasvälipuhdistajat; Hampaiden valkaisu; Kielikaapimet; Hammaskoru; Hammasharjan lisätarvikkeet; Hammasharjat; Hammastahna; Hammastahnapuristimet ja -automaatit; Hammastikkukotelo; Hammastikut
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cuidados bucais: Sprays bucal; Fio-dental; Protetores bucais; Refis para jatos de água; Jatos de água para limpeza bucal; Adesivos para dentadura; Limpadores de próteses; Kits de reparos para dentaduras; Dentaduras; Massageadores de gengiva; Escovas interdentais; Antisséptico bucal; Óleos para oil pulling; Géis orais; Pastilhas e comprimidos probióticos orais; Estojos para aparelhos ortodônticos; Cera ortodôntica; Fio-dental elétrico; Branqueadores dentais; Limpadores de língua; Jóias dentais e gemas para dentes; Acessórios para escova de dente; Escovas de dente; Pasta de dente; Espremedores e suportes para pasta de dentes; Porta-palitos e estojos; Palitos de dente
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Higiena jamy ustnej: Odświeżacze do ust; Nici dentystyczne; Ochraniacze zębów; Końcówki zapasowe do irygatorów dentystycznych; Irygatory dentystyczne; Kleje do protez; Środki do czyszczenia protez; Zestawy do naprawy protez; Protezy; Stymulatory do masażu dziąseł; Szczoteczki międzyzębowe; Płyny do płukania jamy ustnej; Oleje do płukania jamy ustnej (oil pulling); Żele do jamy ustnej; Probiotyczne pastylki i tabletki do jamy ustnej; Pudełeczka na aparaty ortodontyczne; Wosk ortodontyczny; Flossery; Wybielacze zębów; Szczoteczki do czyszczenia języka; Ozdoby dentystyczne; Akcesoria do szczoteczek do zębów; Szczoteczki do zębów; Pasty do zębów; Wyciskacze i dozowniki do pasty do zębów; Pojemniki i etui na wykałaczki; Wykałaczki
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Oral Care: Breath Sprays; Dental Floss; Dental Mouthguards; Dental Water Jet Replacement Tips; Dental Water Jets; Denture Adhesives; Denture Cleaners; Denture Repair Kits; Dentures; Gum Stimulators; Interdental Brushes; Mouthwash; Oil Pulling Oils; Oral Gels; Oral Probiotic Lozenges & Tablets; Orthodontic Appliance Cases; Orthodontic Wax; Power Flossers; Teeth Whiteners; Tongue Scrapers; Tooth Gems & Dental Jewelry; Toothbrush Accessories; Toothbrushes; Toothpaste; Toothpaste Squeezers & Dispensers; Toothpick Holders & Cases; Toothpicks
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Ağız Bakımı: Nefes Spreyleri; Diş İplikleri; Dişlikler; Ağız Banyosu Yedek Uçları; Ağız Banyoları; Protez Diş Yapıştırıcıları; Protez Diş Temizleyiciler; Protez Onarım Setleri; Protez Dişler; Diş Eti Uyarıcılar; Arayüz Fırçaları; Ağız Çalkalama Suları; Yağ Çekme Yağları; Ağız Jelleri; Ağız Probiyotik Pastilleri ve Tabletleri; Ortodontik Cihaz Kılıfları; Ortodontik Mum; Elektrikli Plak ve Tartar Temizleyici; Diş Beyazlatıcılar; Dil Fırçaları; Diş Taşları ve Dental Takılar; Diş Fırçası Aksesuarları; Diş Fırçaları; Diş Macunları; Diş Macunu Sıkıcı ve Dağıtıcılar; Kürdan Tutucuları Ve Kutuları; Kürdanlar
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Орална грижа: Спрейове за дъх; Конец за зъби; Стоматологични предпазители за уста; Накрайници за смяна на зъбен душ; Зъбни душове; Лепила за протези; Почистващи препарати за протези; Комплекти за поправка на протези; Зъбни протези; Стимулатори на венци; Интердентални четки; Вода за уста; Масла за изплакване на уста; Орални гелове; Орални пробиотични таблетки; Кутии за ортодонтски апарти; Ортодонтски восък; Електрически флосър; Избелващи средства за зъби; Стъргалки за език; Зъбни кристали и дентални бижута; Аксесоари за четки за зъби; Четки за зъби; Паста за зъби; Изстисквачки и диспенсъри за паста за зъби; Кутийки и калъфи за клечки за зъби; Клечки за зъби
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cuidado oral: Sprays para o hálito; Fio dental; Protetores bucais; Pontas de substituição de jato de água dentário; Jatos de água dentário; Adesivos para dentadura; Produtos de limpeza para dentadura; Kits de reparação para dentadura; Dentaduras; Estimuladores das gengivas; Escovilhões interdentários; Elixires; Óleos para oil pulling; Géis orais; Pastilhas e comprimidos probióticos orais; Estojos de aparelhos ortodônticos; Cera ortodôntica; Jatos dentários; Branqueadores dentários; Raspadores de língua; Gemas dentárias e joias para dentes; Acessórios de escovas; Escovas de dentes; Pastas de dentes; Espremedores e distribuidores de pasta dos dentes; Porta-palitos e estojos; Escovilhões dentários
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cuidado bucal: Espráis para el aliento; Hilo dental; Férulas dentales; Cabezales de recambio para irrigadores dentales; Irrigadores dentales; Adhesivos para dentadura; Limpiadores de dentaduras postizas; Kits de reparación de dentaduras; Dentaduras postizas; Estimuladores de encías; Cepillos interdentales; Enjuagues bucales; Aceites para oil pulling (enjuague con aceite); Geles orales; Pastillas y tabletas probióticas orales; Fundas para ortodoncias; Cera ortodóntica; Aplicador de hilo dental eléctrico; Blanqueadores dentales; Limpiadores linguales; Gemas dentales y joyería dental; Accesorios para cepillos de dientes; Cepillos de dientes; Pasta de dientes; Dispensadores y exprimidores de pasta de dientes; Portamondadientes y estuches; Palillos de dientes
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Îngrijire orală: Sprayuri pentru împrospătarea respirației; Ață dentară; Gutiere dentare; Vârfuri de schimb pentru irigator bucal; Irigatoare bucale; Adezivi pentru proteze dentare; Dispozitive de curățare pentru proteze dentare; Seturi de reparații pentru proteze dentare; Proteze dentare; Stimulatoare pentru gingii; Periuțe interdentare; Apă de gură; Uleiuri pentru oil pulling; Geluri orale; Pastile și tablete probiotice orale; Genți pentru aparate ortodontice; Ceară ortodontică; Dușuri bucale; Produse pentru albirea dinților; Raclete pentru limbă; Bijuterii și pietre pentru dinți; Accesorii pentru periuța de dinți; Periuțe de dinți; Pastă de dinți; Dispozitive pentru strâns tuburi și dozatoare pentru pastă de dinți; Suporturi și cutii pentru scobitori; Scobitori
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Starostlivosť o ústnu dutinu: Ústne spreje; Zubná niť; Chrániče zubov; Tipy na výmenu trysiek ústnej sprchy; Ústna sprcha; Fixačné krémy na zubné protézy; Čistiace prostriedky na zubné protézy; Súpravy na opravu zubných protéz; Zubné protézy; Odstraňovače zubného kameňa; Medzizubné kefky; Ústna voda; Oleje na ťahanie oleja; Ústne gély; Ústne probiotické pastilky a tablety; Puzdrá na ortodontické pomôcky; Ortodontický vosk; Ústne sprchy; Bieliace prostriedky na zuby; Škrabky na jazyk; Zubné kamienky a dentálne šperky; Príslušenstvo k zubným kefkám; Zubné kefky; Zubná pasta; Vytlačovače a dávkovače zubnej pasty; Držiaky a puzdrá na špáradlá; Špáradlá
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 口腔保健: 口氣芳香噴霧; 牙線; 護齒牙套; 洗牙機替換機頭; 沖牙機; 假牙黏著劑; 假牙清潔產品; 假牙修補組; 假牙; 牙齦按摩器; 牙間刷; 漱口水; 油漱油; 口腔膠; 口腔益生菌錠劑及片劑; 矯正器盒; 矯正蠟; 沖牙器; 牙齒美白產品; 刮舌器; 牙齒寶石及牙飾; 電動牙刷配件; 牙刷; 牙膏; 擠牙膏器; 牙籤架及盒; 牙籤
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Tannpleie: Munnspray; Tanntråd; Tannbeskyttere; Erstatningstupper for munndusjer; Munndusjer; Gebisslim; Rensemidler for gebiss; Reparasjonssett for gebiss; Gebiss; Tannkjøttstimulatorer; Interdentalbørster; Munnrens; Oljeskyllingsoljer; Munngeler; Probiotiske sugetabletter og tabletter for munnen; Etuier for ortodontiske apparater; Ortodontisk voks; Elektriske tanntrådapparater; Tannblekere; Tungeskraper; Tannpynt og tannsmykker; Tilbehør til tannbørster; Tannbørster; Tannpasta; Tannpastaklemmere og -dispensere; Tannpirkerholdere og etuier; Tannpirkere
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Njega usne šupljine: Sprejevi za svjež dah; Zubni konac; Štitnici za zube; Zamjenski vrhovi za oralni tuš; Oralni tuševi; Ljepila za zubne proteze; Sredstva za čišćenje zubnih proteza; Kompleti za popravak zubnih proteza; Zubne proteze; Stimulatori desni; Interdentalne četkice; Vodica za ispiranje usta; Ulja za ispiranje usta; Oralni gelovi; Oralne probiotičke pastile i tablete; Kutije za ortodontske aparate; Ortodontski vosak; Dentalni tuševi; Sredstva za izbjeljivanje zubi; Strugalice za jezik; Zubni dragulji i dentalni nakit; Dodaci za četkice za zube; Četkice za zube; Pasta za zube; Pribor za tiskanje i dozatori paste za zube; Držači i kutijice za čačkalice; Čačkalice za zube
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Уход за полостью рта: Освежители для полости рта; Зубные нити; Капы; Насадки для ирригаторов; Ирригаторы; Клей для зубных протезов; Средства для очищения зубных протезов; Наборы для ремонта зубных протезов; Зубные протезы; Межзубные стимуляторы; Межзубные щетки; Ополаскиватели для полости рта; Масла для полоскания рта; Оральные гели; Оральные пробиотические леденцы и таблетки; Футляры для ортодонтических конструкций; Ортодонтический воск; Электрические зубочистки; Отбеливание зубов; Скребки для языка; Зубные украшения и дентальная бижутерия; Аксессуары для зубных щеток; Зубные щетки; Зубная паста; Выдавливатели и дозаторы зубной пасты; Держатели и футляры для зубочисток; Зубочистки
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Ustna higiena: Ustno pršilo; Zobna nitka; Ščitniki za zobe; Nadomestne konice za zobne prhe; Zobne prhe; Lepila za zobne proteze; Čistila za zobne proteze; Kompleti za popravilo zobne proteze; Zobne proteze; Stimulatorji za masažo dlesni; Medzobne ščetke; Ustna vodica; Olja za izpiranje ust; Ustni geli; Ustne probiotične pastile in tablete; Etuiji za zobne aparate; Ortodontski vosek; Električne zobne nitke; Sredstva za beljenje zob; Strgala za jezik; Okrasni kristalčki za zobe in zobni nakit; Dodatki za zobne ščetke; Zobne ščetke; Zobna pasta; Pripomočki za iztiskanje in dozirniki zobne paste; Etuiji in držala za zobotrebce; Zobotrebci
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Στοματική φροντίδα: Σπρέι αναπνοής; Οδοντικό νήμα; Μασελάκια δοντιών; Ανταλλακτικές κεφαλές οδοντικών συσκευών νερού; Οδοντικές συσκευές νερού; Κόλλες για τεχνητές οδοντοστοιχίες; Καθαριστικά οδοντοστοιχιών; Κιτ επισκευής οδοντοστοιχιών; Οδοντοστοιχίες; Συσκευές διέγερσης ούλων; Μεσοδόντια βουρτσάκια; Στοματικό διάλυμα; Έλαια oil pulling; Στοματικά τζελ; Προβιοτικά σε παστίλιες στόματος; Θήκες ορθοδοντικών συσκευών; Ορθοδοντικό κερί; Ηλεκτρικά νήματα δοντιών; Λευκαντικά δοντιών; Καθαριστές γλώσσας; Στρας και κοσμήματα δοντιών; Αξεσουάρ οδοντόβουρτσας; Οδοντόβουρτσες; Οδοντόκρεμα; Στύφτες & διανομείς οδοντόκρεμας; Θήκες οδοντογλυφίδων; Οδοντογλυφίδες
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การดูแลปาก: สเปรย์ระงับกลิ่นปาก; ไหมขัดฟัน; ที่กันการกัดฟัน; อะไหล่ส่วนหัวของที่ฉีดน้ำทำความสะอาดฟัน; เครื่องทำความสะอาดฟันด้วยน้ำ; สารยึดติดฟันปลอม; ผลิตภัณฑ์ทำความสะอาดฟันปลอม; ชุดซ่อมฟันปลอม; ฟันปลอม; เครื่องนวดเหงือก; แปรงทำความสะอาดซอกฟัน; น้ำยาบ้วนปาก; น้ำมันสำหรับบ้วนปาก; เจลทาในช่องปาก; โปรไบโอติกเม็ดอมทางช่องปาก; ที่ใส่อุปกรณ์ทันตกรรมจัดฟัน; ขี้ผึ้งทันตกรรม; เครื่องทำความสะอาดซอกฟันไฟฟ้า; ผลิตภัณฑ์ทำให้ฟันขาว; ที่ขูดลิ้น; อัญมณีและเครื่องประดับติดฟัน; อุปกรณ์แปรงสีฟัน; แปรงสีฟัน; ยาสีฟัน; ที่บีบและจ่ายยาสีฟัน; กล่องและที่ใส่ไม้จิ้มฟัน; ไม้จิ้มฟัน
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > 口腔ケア: 口臭予防スプレー; デンタルフロス; デンタルマウスピース; 口腔洗浄器用替えチップ; 口腔洗浄器; 義歯・入れ歯安定剤; 義歯・入れ歯洗浄剤; 義歯・入れ歯修理キット; 義歯・入れ歯; 歯ぐき用マッサージブラシ; 歯間ブラシ; マウスウォッシュ; オイルプリング用オイル; 口腔用ジェル; 口腔プロバイオティクストローチとタブレット; 歯列矯正器具用ケース; 矯正用ワックス; 電動デンタルフロス; ホワイトニング; 舌ブラシ; 歯の宝石と歯科用ジュエリー; 歯ブラシ用品; 歯ブラシ; 歯磨き粉; 歯磨き粉チューブ絞り; 爪楊枝ホルダーとケース; 楊枝
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Soins buccaux: Spray pour l’haleine; Fil dentaire; Gouttières dentaires; Embouts de rechange pour hydropulseurs dentaires; Hydropulseurs; Adhésifs pour dentiers; Nettoyants pour prothèses dentaires; Kits de réparation de dentiers; Prothèses dentaires; Stimulateurs de gencives; Brossettes interdentaires; Bains de bouche; Huiles pour oil pulling; Gels buccaux; Pastilles et comprimés probiotiques buccaux; Boîtes pour appareils dentaires; Cire orthodontique; Fils dentaires électriques; Blanchisseurs de dents; Gratte-langue; Bijoux dentaires; Accessoires de brosses à dents; Brosses à dents; Dentifrice; Pousse-dentifrice et distributeurs de dentifrice; Porte-cure-dents et étuis; Cure-dents
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc răng miệng: Nước xịt thơm miệng; Chỉ nha khoa; Máng bảo vệ răng; Đầu vòi phun nước nha khoa; Máy tăm nước nha khoa; Vật liệu gắn răng giả; Dụng cụ làm sạch răng; Bộ thiết bị sửa chữa răng giả; Răng giả; Mát-xa nướu; Bàn chải kẽ răng; Nước súc miệng; Dầu súc miệng; Gel bôi miệng; Viên ngậm và viên nén probiotic miệng; Hộp đựng thiết bị chỉnh răng; Sáp chỉnh nha; Bàn chải đánh răng điện kèm chỉ nha khoa; Sản phẩm làm trắng răng; Tưa lưỡi; Đá trang trí răng và trang sức nha khoa; Phụ kiện bàn chải đánh răng; Bàn chải đánh răng; Kem đánh răng; Dụng cụ ép và nhả kem đánh răng; Hộp đựng tăm; Tăm
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Mundpleje: Mundsprays; Tandtråd; Tandbeskyttere; Udskiftelige dyser til mundskyllere; Mundskyllere; Klæbemidler til proteser; Proteserensere; Tandplejesæt; Proteser; Tandkødsstimulatorer; Mellemrumsbørster; Mundskyl; Oil pulling-olier; Orale geléer; Orale probiotiske pastiller og tabletter; Etuier til bøjler, tandbeskyttere og proteser; Ortodontisk voks; Elektrisk tandtråd; Tandblegning; Tungeskrabere; Tandædelstene og tandsmykker; Tilbehør til tandbørster; Tandbørster; Tandpasta; Holdere og klemmer til tandpasta; Tandstikker-holdere og -etuier; Tandstikkere
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 口腔护理: 口气清新剂; 牙线; 护齿套; 冲牙器替换喷头; 水压式冲牙机; 假牙粘合剂/义齿胶黏剂; 假牙清洁剂; 假牙维修套装; 假牙; 牙龈刺激器; 牙缝刷; 漱口水; 漱口油; 口腔凝胶; 口腔益生菌含片; 正畸保持器/矫治器盒; 正畸蜡; 电动牙线棒; 牙齿美白用品; 刮舌器; 牙齿装饰和牙饰; 牙刷配件; 牙刷; 牙膏; 挤牙膏器/机; 牙签盒; 牙签
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Szájápolás: Lehelet spray-k; Fogselyem; Fogászati fogvédők; Fogászati vízsugárcsere-hegyek; Fogászati vízsugarak; Fogsorragasztók; Fogsortisztítók; Fogsorjavító készletek; Fogsorok; Gumi stimulátorok; Interdentális kefék; Szájvíz; Olajhúzó olajok; Szájgélek; Száj probiotikus pasztillák és tabletták; Fogszabályozásikészülék-tokok; Fogszabályzó viasz; Elektromos fogselymek; Fogfehérítők; Nyelvkaparók; Fogkövek és fogékszerek; Fogkefe-kiegészítők; Fogkefék; Fogkrémek; Fogkrémkinyomók és -adagolók; Fogpiszkálótartók és -tokok; Fogpiszkálók
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 구강 관리: 구강 청정 스프레이; 치실; 교정용 마우스피스; 구강세정기 교체 노즐; 구강 세정기; 구강 접착제; 틀니 세정 용품; 틀니 수리 키트; 틀니; 잇몸용 마사지기; 치간 칫솔; 구강세척제; 오일 풀링 오일; 구강 젤; 구강 프로바이오틱 로젠지 및 정제; 치과 교정 장치 케이스; 교정용 왁스; 전동 구강 세정기; 치아 미백제; 혀 클리너; 치아 보석 및 치아 장식; 칫솔 부대용품; 칫솔; 치약; 치약 짜개/디스펜서; 이쑤시개 홀더 및 케이스; 이쑤시개
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Munvård: Munsprayer; Tandtråd; Tandskydd; Ersättningsmunstycken för munduschar; Munduschar; Protesfixativ; Rengöring av tandproteser; Reparationskit för tandproteser; Tandproteser; Tandköttsmassage; Borstar för tandmellanrum; Munvatten; Oljedragningsoljor; Orala geler; Probiotiska pastiller och tabletter för oral användning; Behållare för tandregleringsprodukter; Ortodontiskt vax; Eltandtrådsapparater; Tandblekning; Tungskrapor; Tandädelstenar och tandsmycken; Tillbehör till tandborstar; Tandborstar; Tandkräm; Tandkrämsklämmor och doserare; Tandpetarhållare och etuier; Tandpetare